Missouri, session 2026, SB1593.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 9.405, to read as
follows:
9.405. April twenty-seventh each year is hereby
designated as "Ulysses S. Grant Day" in Missouri. The
citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in
appropriate events and activities to celebrate the life of
the Civil War general and eighteenth president of the United
States, who made his home in St. Louis, Missouri, in the
years following his graduation from West Point and before
the Civil War.
✓